Wyoming, session 2026, HB0170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 7-13-402(b)(intro) is amended to
read:

7-13-402. General powers and duties of board;
eligibility for parole; immunity.

HB0170

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0428
(b) A prisoner is not eligible for parole on a
sentence if, while serving that sentence, he has been
convicted in the district court or found, by a final
determination of the Wyoming department of corrections
administrative hearing process, of having:

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0170